Massachusetts, session 194th, H1686.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a special legislative commission established pursuant to
section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws to study and report on the use of service animals in
the commonwealth. The commission shall consist of 17 members: 2 of whom shall be the chairs
of the joint committee on the judiciary or their designees, who shall serve as co-chairs; 1 of
whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; 1 of whom shall be
appointed by the senate president; 1 of whom shall be appointed by the house minority leader; 1
of whom shall be appointed by the senate minority leader; 1 of whom shall be the governor or
their designee; 1 of whom shall be the attorney general or their designee; 1 of whom shall be the
director of the Massachusetts office on disability or their designee; 1 of whom shall be the
executive director of the Massachusetts commission against discrimination or their designee; 1 of
whom shall be the executive director of the municipal police training committee established
pursuant to section 116 of chapter 6 of the General Laws or their designee; 1 of whom shall be
of 3

the executive director of the mental health legal advisors committee established pursuant to
section 34E of chapter 221 of the General Laws or their designee; 1 of whom shall be the
president and chief executive officer of the Massachusetts Restaurant Association, Inc. or their
designee; and 4 members who shall be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a
professional service dog organization headquartered in the commonwealth accredited by
Assistance Dogs International, specializing in public advocacy and education and the training of
service dogs that has been in existence for not less than 46 years and has placed not less than 900
service dogs in the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall be a representative from Tanglewood in the
town of Lenox, 1 of whom shall be a member of an association advocating for the interests of
retailers in the commonwealth and 1 of whom shall be a person with a disability who resides in
the commonwealth who is an employee of a service dog training team in which the service dog
has received its training from an Assistance Dogs International accredited service dog
organization.
(b) The study shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) reviewing current federal, state
and local laws and procedures governing the use of service animals; (ii) examining the use and
benefit of service animals by individuals with disabilities; (iii) investigating the presence,
prevalence and impact of fraud, misrepresentation and other misuse of service animals; (iv)
researching laws and practices in other jurisdictions with the objective to deter the misuse of
service animals; and (v) identifying training and educational opportunities aimed at increasing
understanding of laws governing the use of service animals among public officials, law
enforcement, business owners and members of the public. The commission shall report on: (A)
recommending changes to laws governing the use of service animals, if any, including the
definition of “service animal” and whether to introduce legislation prohibiting and civilly
of 3

penalizing service animal fraud; and (B) determining the feasibility of certifying, registering or
licensing service animals.
(c) The commission shall file its report not later than April 1, 2026 with the clerks of the
house of representatives and the senate, the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways
and means and the chairs of the joint committee on the judiciary.
of 3